Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1119 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Insurance
Consumers Protection Act".


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2144 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1119.1 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Insurance Consumers Protection Act:
1. "Bad faith" means conduct of an insurer that violates its
duty or duties of good faith and fair dealing to a first-party
claimant or third-party beneficiary by acts including but not
limited to unreasonably or untimely refusing to pay or tender the
proper benefits for a valid claim under the insurance policy. This
duty of good faith and fair dealing is contained in every insurance
contract and is a nondelegable duty;
2. "First-party claimant" means an individual corporation,
association, partnership, or other legal entity asserting an
entitlement to benefits owed directly to or on behalf of an insured
under an insurance policy. First-party claimants include a public
entity that has paid a claim for benefits dues to an insurer's
unreasonable delay or denial of the claim;
3. "Insurance" is a contract whereby one undertakes to
indemnify another or to pay a specified amount upon determinable
contingencies;
4. "Insurer" means every person engaged in the business of
making, selling, or binding contracts of health insurance or
indemnity in Oklahoma, except for independent insurance agents and
captive insurance agents that market for only one insurer. A
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2144 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

nonp rofit hospital service and medical indemnity corporation is an
insurer within the meaning of this act. The term insurer does not
include burial associations;
5. "Insured" means a person for whom the insurance policy is
written to protect;
6. "Issued in this state" refers to every health and disability
policy, health insurance contract, health insurance certificate, and
health insurance agreement existing, offered, issued, delivered, or
renewed in the State of Oklahoma or providing health or disability
benefits to a resident or domiciliary of the State of Oklahoma and
every employee benefit plan covering a resident or domiciliary of
the State of Oklahoma, whether or not on behalf of an employer
located or domiciled in Oklahoma, on or after January 1, 2005,
notwithstanding any contractual or statutory choice-of-law provision
to the contrary;
7. "Person" means an individual, entity, company, insurer,
association, organization, society, reciprocal or inter-insurance
exchange, partnership, syndicate, business trust, or corporation;
8. "Prior authorization" or "pre-authorization" means the
review and approval by the insurer of treatment recommendations from
a health insurance policyholder's physician or the review by the
insured's agent experienced in remedying the type of casualty or
damage at issue; and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2144 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

9. "Third-party beneficiary" means a person that receives
health benefits from a contract between two other parties, one of
which is an insurer, even though they are not a party to the
contract.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1119.2 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created a statutory cause of action for an
insured under a health insurance policy, as a first-party claimant,
and any third-party beneficiary to the contract of insurance between
the insurer and insured, to maintain an action in district court or
any court of competent jurisdiction for the bad faith refusal of or
untimely pre-authorization of benefits, and for payment of such
benefits.
B. Provided, however, the recommended treatment for which pre-
authorization or payment of benefits is sought shall be reasonable
and necessary for the person covered by the insurance policy. The
reasonableness and necessity of the recommended treatment shall be
determined by a jury.
C. Either the first-party claimant or third-party beneficiary
may prosecute a claim for bad faith created by this act.
D. A health insurance policy, insurance contract, or plan that
is issued in this state shall not contain a provision purporting to
reserve discretion to the insurer, plan administrator, or claim
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2144 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

admi nistrator to interpret the terms of the policy, contract, or
plan or to determine eligibility for benefits. If an insurance
policy, contract, or plan contains such a provision, the provision
is void.
E. There is no requirement to exhaust any administrative
remedies with the Oklahoma Insurance Department before filing an
action asserting a cause of action for bad faith in a district
court.
F. A claimant under this section is entitled to a trial by
jury.
G. The issue of bad faith is always a question of fact which
must be submitted to a jury pursuant to Section 6 of Article 2 of
the Oklahoma Constitution.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1119.3 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created a statutory cause of action against
an insurer, except pursuant to an insurance policy providing for
statutory workers' compensation benefits under the Administrative
Workers' Compensation Act in Title 85A of the Oklahoma Statutes or
the Workers' Compensation Code in Title 85 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
if the action or actions of the insurer is in bad faith as defined
by this act.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2144 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. There is no requirement to exhaust any administrative
remedies with the Oklahoma Insurance Department before filing an
action asserting a cause of action for bad faith in a district
court.
C. A claimant under this section is entitled to a trial by
jury.
D. The issue of bad faith is always a question of fact which
must be submitted to a jury.
E. The duty of good faith and fair dealing is contained in
every insurance contract and is a nondelegable duty.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1119.4 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A cause of action for bad faith created by this act shall lie
if:
1. The insurer was required under the health insurance policy
to pay the insured's claim;
2. The insurer's refusal to pay the claim was unreasonable or
untimely under the circumstances related to the claim;
3. The insurer had no reasonable basis for the refusal, or the
amount it offered to satisfy the claim was unreasonably low; or
4. The violation by the insurer of its duty of good faith and
fair dealing was the direct cause of the injury sustained by the
insured.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2144 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1119.5 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If the insurer violates its duty or duties of good faith and
fair dealing, the amount of damages shall be fixed as the amount of
money that will compensate a first-party claimant or third-party
beneficiary for any loss suffered as a result of the breach of the
duty of good faith and fair dealing.
B. In fixing the amount of damages, the jury may consider
financial losses, emotional distress, embarrassment, loss of
reputation, and mental pain and suffering.
C. The jury may award punitive damages for the sake of example
and by way of punishing the insurer based upon the following
factors, in accordance with Section 9.1 of Title 23 of the Oklahoma
Statutes:
1. The profitability of the misconduct to the insurer;
2. The duration of the misconduct and any concealment of it;
3. The attitude and conduct of the insurer upon discovery of
the bad faith action; and
4. The financial condition of the insurer.
D. Category I. Where the jury finds by clear and convincing
evidence that an insurer has recklessly disregarded its duty to deal
fairly and act in good faith with its insured; the jury, in a
separate proceeding conducted after the jury has made such finding
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2144 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and awarded actual damages, may award punitive damages in an amount
not to exceed the greater of:
1. One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00); or
2. The amount of the actual damages awarded.
E. Category II. Where the jury finds by clear and convincing
evidence that:
1. An insurer has acted intentionally and with malice towards
others; or
2. An insurer has intentionally and with malice breached its
duty to deal fairly and act in good faith with its insured.
The jury, in a separate proceeding conducted after the jury has
made such finding and awarded actual damages, may award punitive
damages in an amount not to exceed the greatest of:
a. Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00),
b. twice the amount of actual damages awarded, or
c. the increased financial benefit derived by the insurer
as a direct result of the conduct causing the injury
to the plaintiff and other persons or entities.
F. Category III. Where the jury finds by clear and convincing
evidence that:
1. An insurer has acted intentionally and with malice towards
others; or
2. An insurer has intentionally and with malice breached its
duty to deal fairly and act in good faith with its insured, and the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2144 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cour t finds, on the record and out of the presence of the jury, that
there is evidence beyond a reasonable doubt that the insurer acted
intentionally and with malice and engaged in conduct life-
threatening to humans, the jury, in a separate proceeding conducted
after the jury has made such finding and awarded actual damages, may
award punitive damages in any amount the jury deems appropriate,
without regard to the limitations set forth in subsections B and C
of this section. Any award of punitive damages under this
subsection awarded in any manner other than as required in this
subsection shall be void and reversible error.
G. In determining the amount, if any, of punitive damages to be
awarded under either subsection B, C, or D of this section, the jury
shall make the award based upon the factors set forth in subsection
A of this section.
H. Any award of punitive damages under this section awarded in
any manner other than as required in this section shall be void and
reversible error.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1119.6 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A cause of action for bad faith as provided for by this act
requires analysis of the insurer's action and not the interpretation
of any health insurance plan or how a health insurance plan relates
to the claim. Any insurance contract issued in this state that
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2144 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

offe rs health insurance benefits shall not contain a provision
purporting to reserve discretion to the insurer to interpret the
terms of the contract. If an insurance contract contains such a
provision, the provision is void. The interpretation of a health
insurance plan shall not be a defense to a bad faith cause of
action.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1119.7 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The causes of actions authorized in this act are in addition to,
and do not limit or affect, other actions available by statute or
common law, now or in the future. The statutory causes of action
created by this act are in addition to the common law bad faith
causes of action and in no way limit remedies or rights established
by common law for the cause of action for breach of the duty of good
faith and fair dealing under Oklahoma law.
SECTION 9. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RULES
April 24, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED






SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2144 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)